Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 87.691 is amended to read:
87.691. (1) After the time specified in the  notice given under ORS 87.689 expires, if the owner
determines, based  on the owner’s previous experience, that the personal property subject to the lien
created by ORS 87.687 has a value of [ $300] $1,000 or less, the owner may dispose of the  property
at the owner’s sole discretion.
(2) After the time specified in the notice given under ORS  87.689 expires, if the owner deter-
mines, based on the owner’s previous experience,  that the personal property subject to the lien
created by ORS 87.687 has  a value of more than [ $300] $1,000, the owner shall cause an advertise-
ment of the  sale to be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the city or county in which the self-service storage facility is located. If there is  no
newspaper of general circulation in the city or  county, the advertisement must be posted in not
fewer than six conspicuous places in the  neighborhood in which the self-service storage facility is
located. The advertisement must include:
(a) The address of the self-service storage facility, the number, if any, of the space  where the
personal property is located and the name of the occupant.
(b) The time, place and manner of the sale.
(3) The sale of the personal property may not take place earlier than 15 days after the first
advertisement, publication or  posting concerning the sale. The sale must conform to the terms stated
in the advertisement published or posted under this section.
(4) The owner may conduct the lien  sale without obtaining a license and may offer the personal
property for sale on a publicly accessible website that regularly offers personal property  for auction
or sale, but the owner shall complete the sale of the personal property at  the self-service storage
facility or at a suitable place closest to where the personal property is held or stored.
(5)(a) If the owner does not receive any bids at the public sale held under this section, the owner
may dispose of  the personal property in another manner at the owner’s sole discretion. The owner
may satisfy the lien created by ORS 87.687 and reasonable expenses associated with  the disposition
from the proceeds of the disposition but shall hold the balance, if any,  for delivery on demand to the
occupant. If the occupant does not claim the balance  of the proceeds within two years after the date
of the disposition, the owner shall presume the balance is abandoned  and shall report and deliver
the balance to the State Treasurer as provided in ORS 98.352.
Enrolled Senate Bill 433 (SB 433-A) Page 1
(b) The owner, an employee of the owner, an affiliate or relative of the owner or  an associate
or relative of the employee  may not acquire, directly or indirectly, property that is subject to dis-
posal under this section.
(6)(a) If personal property that is subject to the  lien is a motor vehicle, watercraft or trailer, the
owner may have the personal property towed away from the self-service storage facility if:
(A) Rent and other  charges for storing the personal property at the self-service storage facility
remain unpaid for 60 days or more; and
(B) The owner sends notice as provided in ORS 87.689.
(b) An owner is not liable for damage to personal property that a  tower removes from the self-
service storage facility once the tower takes possession of the personal property.
(c) A tower has  a lien on personal property the tower removes from the self-service storage fa-
cility for reasonable towing and storage charges as provided in ORS 98.812.
(7) Before a sale or other disposition of personal property under this section,  the occupant may
pay the amount necessary to satisfy the lien and the reasonable expenses incurred under this section
and thereby redeem the personal property.  Upon receiving payment, the owner shall return the
personal property, and thereafter the owner has no liability with respect to the personal property.
(8) After a sale under this section, the owner may satisfy the lien created by ORS 87.687  from
the proceeds of the sale, but shall hold the balance, if any, for  delivery on demand to the occupant.
If the occupant does not claim the balance of the proceeds  within two years after the date of sale,
the owner shall presume that the balance  of the proceeds is abandoned and shall report and deliver
the balance to the State Treasurer as provided in ORS 98.352.
(9) A purchaser  in good faith of the personal property sold to satisfy a lien created by ORS
87.687 takes the property free of any rights of persons against whom the lien was valid,  even if the
owner does not comply with the requirements of this section and ORS 87.689.
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 433 (SB 433-A) Page 2